test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-allget_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - állget: # Verb 'begin'
     állget+V+Inf: állget
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: álgáv
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: álgá
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: állgá
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ällgin
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [állgebehtin, állgebähtten]
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [állgeba, állgeban]
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: állgep
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [állgebehtit, állgebähttet]
     állget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ällgi

     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ällgiv
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ällgi
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: älgij
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: älgijmen
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: älgijden
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [älgijga, älgijgan]
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: älgijme
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: älgijde
     állget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ällgin

     állget+V+Imprt+Sg2: álge  
     állget+V+Imprt+Du2: állgen
     állget+V+Imprt+Pl2: ällgit

     állget+V+ConNeg: álge 
     állget+V+GerII: állgemin
     állget+V+PrfPrc: állgám


#     állget+V+Pot+Sg1: älgitjav
#     állget+V+Pot+Sg2: älgitja
#     állget+V+Pot+Sg3: älgitj
#     állget+V+Pot+Du1: älgitjin
#     állget+V+Pot+Du2: älgitjiehpen #, älgitjähppen]
#     állget+V+Pot+Du3: älgitjiebá
#     állget+V+Pot+Pl1: älgitjip
#     állget+V+Pot+Pl2: älgitjihpit
#     állget+V+Pot+Pl3: älgitji
